Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 6. Regulation.

Secs. 21.84.410 — 21.84.450.
Licensing of agents; license required; qualifications and application; notice of appointment; termination of appointment. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.84.455.
Valuation.

Standards of valuation for certificates issued before January 1, 1999 shall be those provided by the laws applicable immediately before January 1, 1998.

The minimum standards of valuation for certificates issued on or after January 1, 1999 shall be based on the following tables, which shall be under valuation methods and standards, including interest assumptions, in accordance with the laws of this state applicable to life and health insurers issuing policies containing similar benefits:

for certificates of life insurance, the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, or a more recent table made applicable to life insurers;

for annuity and pure endowment certificates, for total and permanent disability benefits, for accidental death benefits, and for noncancellable accident and health benefits, the tables authorized for use by life and health insurers in this state.

The director may, in the director’s discretion, accept other standards for valuation if the director finds that the reserves produced under those standards will not be less in the aggregate than reserves computed in accordance with the minimum valuation standard presented in this section. The director may, in the director’s discretion, vary the standards of mortality applicable to benefit contracts on substandard lives or other extrahazardous lives by any society authorized to do business in this state.

A society, with the consent of the insurance supervisory official of the state of domicile of the society and under conditions that the director may impose, may establish and maintain reserves on its certificates in excess of the reserves required, but the contractual rights of any benefit member shall not be affected.

History.

(§ 25 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.460.
Suspension and revocation of license. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.84.465.
Reports.

Reports shall be filed in accordance with the provisions of this section.

A society transacting business in this state shall annually, before March 2, unless the time has been extended by the director for cause shown, file with the director a true statement of the society’s financial conditions, transactions, and affairs for the preceding calendar year and pay the applicable fee under AS

21.06.250

. The statement shall be in the general form and content approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for fraternal benefit societies and supplemented by additional information required by the director.

As a part of the annual statement required by this section, each society shall, on or before March 1, file with the director a valuation of the society’s certificates in force on the preceding December 31, but the director may, in the director’s discretion, for cause shown, extend the time for filing the valuation for not more than two calendar months. The valuation shall be done in accordance with the standards specified in AS

21.84.455

. The valuation and underlying data shall be certified by a qualified actuary or, at the expense of the society, verified by the actuary of the insurance regulatory agency of the state of domicile of the society.

If a society fails to file the annual statement in the form and within the time provided by this section, the society shall forfeit $100 for each day that the neglect continues, and, upon notice by the director to that effect, the society’s authority to do business in this state shall cease while the default continues.

A synopsis of its annual statement providing an explanation of the facts concerning the condition of the society shall be either printed and mailed to each benefit member of the society not later than June 1 of each year or published in the society’s official publication.

The director may require a society to file quarterly financial statements. If quarterly financial statements are required, the statements must follow for a given quarter the reporting specified in the quarterly financial statement blank form and instructions most recently approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

History.

(§ 26 ch 96 SLA 1997; am § 23 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.84.470.
Misrepresentation. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.475.
License.

Societies that are authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 1998, and societies licensed after January 1, 1998 and before July 1, 1998, may continue the business through June 30, 1998. The authority of those societies and all other societies licensed after January 1, 1998 may be renewed annually, but, in all cases, terminates on the first day of the succeeding July. However, a license issued continues in full force and effect until the new license is issued or specifically refused. For each license or renewal, the society shall pay a fee set under AS

21.06.250

. A certified copy or duplicate of the license shall be prima facie evidence that the licensee is a fraternal benefit society under this chapter.

History.

(§ 27 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.480.
Discrimination and rebates. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.485.
Examination of societies.

The director may examine a society in the manner authorized for an insurer under AS

21.06.120

—

21.06.230

. The requirements, procedures, authorization, and process for examinations authorized under this section shall be the same as for an insurer.

History.

(§ 28 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.490.
Service of process. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.495.
Foreign or alien society; admission.

A foreign or alien society may not transact business in this state without a license issued by the director. A foreign or alien society desiring admission to this state shall comply with the requirements and limitations of this chapter applicable to domestic societies. The society may be licensed to transact business in this state upon filing with the director

a certified copy of its articles of incorporation;

a copy of its bylaws, certified by its secretary or corresponding officer;

a power of attorney to the director as prescribed in AS

21.84.625

;

a statement of its business under oath of its president and secretary or corresponding officers in a form prescribed by the director, verified by an examination made by the supervising insurance official of its home state or other state, territory, province, or country, satisfactory to the director;

certification from the proper official of its home state, territory, province, or country that the society is legally incorporated and licensed to transact business therein;

copies of its certificate forms;

information showing that its assets are invested in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; and

other information the director may consider necessary.

History.

(§ 29 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Secs. 21.84.500 — 21.84.520.
Consolidations and mergers; effect of consolidations and mergers; conversion into mutual life insurer. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.530.
Injunction, liquidation, receivership of domestic society.

When the director upon investigation finds that a domestic society (1) has exceeded its powers; (2) has failed to comply with this chapter; (3) is not fulfilling its contracts in good faith; (4) has a membership of fewer than 400 after an existence of one year or more; or (5) is conducting business fraudulently or in a manner hazardous to its members, creditors, the public, or the business; the director shall notify the society of the findings, state in writing the reasons for dissatisfaction, and demand that the society correct the deficiency. After receipt of the director’s notice the society shall have 30 days in which to comply with the director’s request, and if the society fails to comply with the director, the director shall notify the society of the findings of noncompliance and require the society to show cause on a date named why it should not be enjoined from carrying on any business until the violation complained of has been corrected, or why an action in quo warranto should not be commenced against the society.

If on the date named the society does not present good and sufficient reasons why it should not be enjoined or why the action should not be commenced, the director may present the facts to the attorney general who shall, if the attorney general considers the circumstances warrant, commence an action to enjoin the society from transacting business or in quo warranto. The court shall notify the officers of the society of a hearing. If after a full hearing it appears that the society should be enjoined or liquidated or a receiver appointed, the court shall enter the necessary order.

A society so enjoined does not have the authority to do business until

the director finds that the violation complained of has been corrected;

the costs of the action have been paid by the society if the court finds that the society was in default as charged;

the court has dissolved its injunction;

the director has reinstated the society’s license.

If the court orders the society liquidated, it shall be enjoined from carrying on any further business, and the receiver of the society shall proceed at once to take possession of the books, papers, money, and other assets of the society and, under the direction of the court, proceed immediately to close the affairs of the society and to distribute its funds to those entitled to them.

An action under this section may not be recognized in a court of this state unless brought by the attorney general upon request of the director. When a receiver is to be appointed for a domestic society, the court shall appoint the director as the receiver.

The provisions of this section relating to hearing by the director, action by the attorney general at the request of the director, hearing by the court, injunction, and receivership shall be applicable to a society that voluntarily determines to discontinue business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.84.535.
Suspension, revocation, or refusal of license of foreign or alien society.

When the director, upon investigation, finds that a foreign or alien society transacting or applying to transact business in this state (1) has exceeded its powers, (2) has failed to comply with a provision of this chapter, (3) is not fulfilling its contracts in good faith, or (4) is conducting its business fraudulently or in a manner hazardous to its members or creditors or the public, the director shall notify the society in writing of the deficiency or deficiencies and state in writing the reasons for the director’s dissatisfaction. The director shall immediately issue a written order to the society requiring that the deficiency or deficiencies be corrected. After receipt of the order, the society shall have 30 days to comply with the director’s order for correction. If the society fails to comply, the director shall notify the society of the findings of noncompliance and require the society to show cause on a date to be named why its license should not be suspended, revoked, or refused. If, on that date, the society does not present good and sufficient reason why its authority to do business in this state should not be suspended, revoked, or refused, the director may suspend or refuse the license of the society to do business in this state until satisfactory evidence is furnished to the director that the suspension or refusal should be withdrawn, or the director may revoke the authority of the society to do business in this state.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the society from continuing in good faith all contracts made in this state during the time the society was legally authorized to transact business in this state.

History.

(§ 30 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.540.
Injunction.

An application or petition for injunction against a domestic, foreign, or alien society, or branch thereof, may not be recognized in a court of this state unless made by the attorney general upon request of the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.84.550.
Review. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.560.
Society and fraternal benefit societies defined. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.84.565.
Licensing of agents.

Agents of societies shall be licensed in accordance with the provisions of AS 21.27.

An examination or license may not be required of a regular salaried officer, employee, or member of a licensed society who devotes substantially all the person’s services to activities other than the solicitation of fraternal insurance contracts from the public and who receives for the solicitation of fraternal insurance contracts no commission or other compensation directly dependent upon the amount of business obtained.

History.

(§ 31 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.570.
Lodge system defined. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.84.575.
Unfair methods of competition and unfair and deceptive acts and practices.

A society and an agent authorized to do business in this state are subject to the provisions of AS 21.36; however, nothing in those provisions shall be construed as applying to or affecting

the right of a society to determine its eligibility requirements for membership; or

the offering of benefits exclusively to members or persons eligible for membership in the society by a subsidiary corporation or affiliated organization of the society.

History.

(§ 32 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.580.
Representative form of government defined. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.84.590.
Other provisions applicable. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]